Utah statutes.
78B-6-1504.   Approval of transfers of structured settlement payment rights.
Direct or indirect transfer of structured settlement payment rights may not be
effective and a structured settlement obligor or annuity issuer may not be
required to make any payment directly or indirectly to any transferee of
structured settlement payment rights unless the transfer has been approved in
advance in a final court order based on express findings by the court that:
(1)  the transfer is in the best interest of the payee, taking into account
the welfare and support of the payee's dependents;
(2)  the payee has been advised in writing by the transferee to seek
independent professional advice regarding the transfer and has either received
such advice or knowingly waived such advice in writing; and
(3)  the transfer does not contravene any applicable statute or the order of
any court or other government authority.
